Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB169.
hereby enacts as follows:PART IPRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Gaming Control Appropriation Act of 2025.PART IIISTATE GAMING FUNDRESTRICTED REVENUE ACCOUNTSSection 301. State Gaming Fund.The following amounts set forth in this part, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated from the 123456789101112131415161718192021 State Gaming Fund restricted revenue accounts under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1401 (relating to slot machine licensee deposits) to the agencies of the Executive Department named in this part for the purposes set forth for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.Section 302. Attorney General.The following amounts are appropriated to the Attorney General:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Attorney General related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).State appropriation............. 1,618,000Section 303. Department of Revenue.The following amounts are appropriated to the Department of Revenue:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Department of Revenue related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).State appropriation............. 7,122,000Section 304. Pennsylvania State Police.The following amounts are appropriated to the Pennsylvania State Police:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Pennsylvania State Police related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).State appropriation............. 38,018,000Section 305. Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board.The following amounts are appropriated to the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board:20250SB0169PN0538 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the proper operation and administration of the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board. This appropriation includes $7,100,000 from the restricted revenue account established in the State Gaming Fund for fees and other revenues collected by the board.State appropriation............. 57,222,000PART VFANTASY CONTEST FUNDRESTRICTED REVENUE ACCOUNTSSection 501. Fantasy Contest Fund.The following amounts set forth in this part, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated from the Fantasy Contest Fund restricted revenue accounts under 4 Pa.C.S. § 332 (relating to licensed operator deposits) to the agencies of the Executive Department named in this part for the purposes set forth for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.Section 502. Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board.The following amounts are appropriated to the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to amusements generally).State appropriation............. 280,000Section 503. Department of Revenue.The following amounts are appropriated to the 20250SB0169PN0538 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Revenue:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Department of Revenue related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to amusements generally).State appropriation............. 418,000PART VIIVIDEO GAMING FUNDRESTRICTED REVENUE ACCOUNTSSection 701. Video Gaming Fund.The following amounts set forth in this part, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated from the Video Gaming Fund restricted revenue accounts under 4 Pa.C.S. § 4104 (relating to regulatory assessments) to the agencies of the Executive Department named in this part for the purposes set forth for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.Section 702. Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board.The following amounts are appropriated to the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).State appropriation............. 475,000Section 703. Department of Revenue.The following amounts are appropriated to the Department of Revenue:For salaries, wages and all necessary expenses of the Department of Revenue related to 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).20250SB0169PN0538 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation............. 683,000PART IXMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 901. Transfers prohibited.There is no authority for the State Treasurer, the Secretary of the Budget, the Secretary of Revenue or the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board to transfer any money within or between the appropriations in Parts III, V and VII.Section 902. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0169PN0538 - 5 - 1234567891011